Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 In General
47-1-13.1.
Annual compensation limits in determining benefits or contributions due.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Annual compensation” means compensation during the determination period. Such term shall include any cost-of-living adjustment in effect for a calendar year if the determination period begins with or within such calendar year.

“Determination period” means the plan year or such other consecutive 12 month period over which compensation is otherwise determined under the public retirement or pension system.

The annual compensation of a plan member during any plan year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, which exceeds $200,000.00, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases in accordance with Section 401(a)(17)(B) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall not be taken into account in determining benefits or contributions due from the public retirement or pension system for any plan year. If the determination period consists of fewer than 12 months, the annual compensation limit shall be an amount equal to the otherwise applicable annual compensation limit multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months in the short determination period and the denominator of which is 12. If the compensation for any prior determination period is taken into account in determining a plan member’s contributions or benefits for the current plan year, the compensation for such prior determination period shall be subject to the applicable annual compensation limit in effect for the prior period.

The annual compensation of a plan member during any plan year beginning on and after January 1, 1996, and before January 1, 2002, which exceeds $150,000.00, as indexed as provided in Section 401(a)(17)(B) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, shall be disregarded for purposes of computing contributions to or benefits due from the public retirement or pension system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-13.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 3/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “section, the” for “section the” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a) and substituted “cost-of-living” for “cost of living” in the second sentence of paragraph (a)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-1-14.
“Retirement system” defined; records exempt from public inspection.

As used in this Code section, the term “retirement system” means any public retirement system created by this title. Such term also means any association of like political subdivisions the purpose of which is the pooling of funds for retirement or pension purposes.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the following records maintained by a retirement system are exempted from being open to inspection by the general public:

Records containing wiring or automated clearing house transfer of funds instructions or access codes;

Records containing bank account numbers;

All proprietary computer software; and

Any business, financial, or personal information in the possession of such retirement system concerning a party other than such retirement system.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the following records maintained by a retirement system are exempted from being open to inspection by the general public for a period of one year from the date such records were created:

Records containing investment advice rendered by any investment adviser or retirement system employee;

Exhibits to minutes of retirement system board meetings or investment committee board meetings which contain securities trading information;

Securities trade tickets, confirmations, and other records pertaining to securities trades; and

Records which contain proposed terms of sale for real property owned by a retirement system; provided, however, that the records defined in this paragraph shall be subject to disclosure at any time after the sale of real property is consummated.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the following records maintained by a retirement system are exempted from being open to inspection by the general public until the end of the calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the record is created:

Records which contain information relating to the investment portfolio composition and positions; and

Exhibits to minutes of retirement system board meetings or investment committee board meetings which contain information relating to investment portfolio composition and positions.

The provisions of subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this Code section shall not restrict access to records:

By an employee of a retirement system in the course of his or her official duties;

Subject to subpoena or other legal process of a court or administrative agency having competent jurisdiction in legal proceedings in which the state or a retirement system is a party;

In criminal prosecutions or other criminal actions brought by state or federal law enforcement authorities;

Given to federal or state regulatory or law enforcement agencies in the course of their official duties; or

Given to the Attorney General and the Department of Law, the Office of Planning and Budget, the state accounting officer and the State Accounting Office, or the state auditor and the Department of Audits and Accounts for use and public disclosure in the ordinary performance of those officers’ and offices’ duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 44, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1246, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 39/HB 293; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in paragraph (c)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-1-15.
Circumstances when survivors benefits are paid to secondary beneficiary.

Unless otherwise expressly stated elsewhere in this title, in the event a person designated by a member of a public retirement or pension system created by this title as the primary beneficiary of a survivors benefit provided by such system does not survive the member by at least 32 days, any such benefits shall be paid to the secondary beneficiary, or as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 176, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, Code Section 47-1-14, as enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 176, § 1, was renumbered as Code Section 47-1-15.

47-1-16.
Public retirement systems prohibited from having insurable interest in members; prohibition on expending or obligating funds for purchase of life insurance on members; exception.

No public retirement system in this state shall have an insurable interest in active or retired members of such retirement system. No public retirement system shall have the authority to expend or obligate funds under the control of such retirement system to purchase life insurance on its members except where all benefits are paid to a member’s estate or to a beneficiary designated by the individual member.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 673, § 1/HB 297.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 1, 2012.

47-1-17.
Required education for public retirement system trustees.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Public retirement system” means any retirement or pension system now or hereafter created by or pursuant to the authority of Georgia law or the Constitution of Georgia which has public employees as members of the retirement or pension system.

“Public retirement system trustee” means a member of a board of trustees or other administrative body or agency charged with the duty of administering a public retirement system.

Each public retirement system trustee shall complete appropriate education applicable to his or her fiduciary duties and obligations under the public retirement system.

Each public retirement system trustee first appointed or elected on or after July 1, 2019, shall complete a minimum of eight hours of education designated to orient new public retirement system trustees in the areas described in this Code section within one year of becoming a new public retirement system trustee. If such a trustee fails to complete such requirement within 14 months, he or she shall be removed from his or her position as a trustee.

Each public retirement system trustee who was appointed or elected prior to July 1, 2019, or who has served one or more years as a public retirement system trustee shall complete a minimum of 12 hours of continuing education every two years in the areas described in this Code section. If such a trustee fails to complete such requirement within 26 months, he or she shall be removed from his or her position as such trustee.

Applicable education shall include education and training in the following areas:

Laws applicable to public retirement systems, which may include federal and state laws applicable to specific public retirement systems, laws applicable to public retirement system trustees, the applicable common law duties of trustees listed in Title 53, and laws related to open meetings and open records;

Roles, duties, and responsibilities of public retirement system trustees;

Ethics and conflicts of interest;

Governance, administration, and funding of public retirement systems;

Investments; investment management, portfolios, and strategies; and measurements of performance; and

Audit and actuarial principles and methods related to public retirement systems.

Applicable education may include:

Seminars, conferences, or schools sponsored by educational institutions or professional organizations;

Online continuing education coursework;

Continuing education received at any public retirement system meeting; or

Any other continuing education approved by the public retirement system.

Each public retirement system shall maintain a record of its public retirement system trustee education.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 739, § 1/HB 196.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.